District of Columbia statutes.
16-3101

Definition.

As used in this chapter, the term “Probate Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 598, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 561, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(l)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3101.
1973 Ed., § 16-3101.